Louisiana, session 2026, HB1169.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Any property sold to or expropriated by the Coastal Protection and
Restoration Authority for the Mid-Barataria Sediment Diversion project shall be returned
to the prior owner for an amount which shall not exceed the amount the prior owner received
as compensation for the sale or expropriation.
Section 2. Alternatively, at the option of the prior owner, the Coastal Protection and
Restoration Authority shall execute an agreement with the prior owner to allow the prior
owner access to the property sold or expropriated for the Mid-Barataria Sediment Diversion
project for recreational purposes.